tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Kayıkçılık ve Rafting > Kayaking Kanoları: Dere Tekneleri; Balıkçı kajakları; Düz Su Kayakları; Katlanır Kayaklar; Şişme Kayaklar; Kajak kitleri; Oyun Tekneleri; Yarış Kayakları; Üstte Oturmalı Kayaklar; Slalom Kayakları; Sörf Kayakları; Whitewater Kayakları
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Navegación y rafting > Kayaks: Barcos de ribera; Kayaks de pesca; Kayaks de aguas tranquilas; Kayaks plegables; Kayaks inflables; Kits para kayak; Barcos de recreo; Kayaks de competición; Kayaks con asiento superior; Kayaks de slalom; Kayaks para surfear; Kayaks de aguas bravas
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Sejlads og rafting > Kajakker: Creekboats; Fiskekajakker; Fladvandskajakker; Foldekajakker; Oppustelige kajakker; Kajaksæt; Playboats; Løbskajakker; Sit-on-top-kajakker; Slalomkajakker; Surferkajakker; Whitewater-kajakker
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Chèo thuyển & thả bè > Kayak: Thuyền lạch; Kayak câu cá; Thuyền Kayak nước phẳng; Thuyền Kayak gấp được; Thuyền Kayak bơm hơi; Bộ lắp ráp kayak; Thuyền vui chơi; Thuyền Kayak đua; Thuyền Kayak ngồi ở đầu; Thuyền Kayak vượt chướng ngại vật; Thuyền Kayak lướt sóng; Thuyền Kayak nước sủi bọt
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Boating & Rafting > Kayaks: Creekboats; Fishing Kayaks; Flatwater Kayaks; Folding Kayaks; Inflatable Kayaks; Kayak Kits; Playboats; Racing Kayaks; Sit-On-Top Kayaks; Slalom Kayaks; Surf Kayaks; Whitewater Kayaks
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 보트/래프트 > 카약: 크릭보트; 낚시용 카약; 플랫워터 카약; 접이식 카약; 공기주입식 카약; 카약 키트; 플레이보트; 레이싱 카약; 싯온탑 카약; 슬라럼 카약; 서핑 카약; 급류용 카약
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Plimbări cu barca și rafting > Caiace: Bărci pentru ape puțin adânci; Caiace de pescuit; Caiace flatwater; Caiace pliabile; Caiace gonflabile; Kituri pentru caiac; Caiace pentru începători; Caiace de curse; Caiace sit-on-top; Caiace pentru slalom; Caiace pentru surf; Caiace pentru ape repezi
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Kajaky, kánoe a rafty > Kajaky: Kajaky – terénní (creakboat); Rybářské kajaky; Kajaky – flatwater; Kajaky – skládací; Kajaky – nafukovací; Sady pro stavbu kajaků; Kajaky – playboat; Závodní kajaky; Kajaky – Sit On Top; Kajaky – slalom; Kajaky – surfing; Kajaky na divokou vodu
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Plaukimas valtimis ir plaustais > Baidarės: Minibaidarės; Žvejybinės baidarės; Baidarės ramiam vandeniui; Sulankstomos baidarės; Pripučiamos baidarės; Baidarių rinkiniai; Akrobatinės baidarės; Lenktyninės baidarės; Ant viršaus sėdimos baidarės; Slalomo baidarės; Bangomūšos baidarės; Plaukimo slenksčiais baidarės
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 划船/泛舟 > 皮艇: 渡河皮艇; 釣魚獨木舟; 靜水皮艇; 折疊皮艇; 充氣皮艇; 獨木舟套組; 花式獨木舟; 競賽皮艇; 坐式獨木舟; 激流獨木舟; 衝浪獨木舟; 激流用獨木舟
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Csónakázás és rafting > Kajakok: Patakcsónakok; Horgászkajakok; Síkvízi kajakok; Összecsukható kajakok; Felfújható kajakok; Kajak-készletek; Játszóhajók; Versenykajakok; Felülről ülős kajakok; Szlalomkajakok; Szörfkajakok; Vadvízi kajakok
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Båtsport > Kajaker: Creekboats; Fiskekajaker; Fritidskajaker; Hopfällbara kajaker; Uppblåsbara kajaker; Kajakkit; Lekbåtar; Racingkajaker; Sit-on-top-kajaker; Slalomkajaker; Surfkajaker; Forsränningskajaker
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Плаване с лодка и рафтинг > Каяци: Речни лодки; Риболовни каяци; Каяци за спокойни води; Сгъваеми каяци; Надуваеми каяци; Комплект за каяк; Лодки за трикове; Състезателни каяци; Седящи каяци; Слалом каяци; Каяци за сърф; Каяци за бърза вода
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > カヌー・ラフティング > カヤック: クリークボート; フィッシングカヤック; フラットウォーターカヤック; 折りたたみカヤック; インフレータブルカヤック; カヤックキット; プレイボート; レーシングカヤック; シットオントップカヤック; スラロームカヤック; サーフカヤック; ホワイトウォーターカヤック
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Plaisance et rafting > Kayaks: Creek boats; Kayaks de pêche; Kayaks d'eau calme; Kayaks pliants; Kayaks gonflables; Kits pour kayak; Play boats; Kayaks de course; Kayaks Sit-On-Top; Kayaks de slalom; Kayaks de surf; Kayaks d'eau vive
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Desportos náuticos e rafting > Caiaques: Barcos de riacho; Caiaques de pesca; Caiaques para águas calmas; Caiaques dobráveis; Caiaques insufláveis; Kits de caiaque; Barcos para freestyle; Caiaques de corrida; Caiaques sit-on-top; Caiaques slalom; Caiaques de surf; Caiaques para rápidos
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Nautica e rafting > Kayak: Creekboats; Kayak da pesca; Kayak per acque piatte; Kayak pieghevoli; Kayak gonfiabili; Kit per kayak; Playboat; Kayak da corsa; Kayak Sit On Top; Kayak da slalom; Kayak da surf; Kayak per acque bianche
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Navegação e rafting > Caiaques: Barcos para riacho; Caiaques de pesca; Caiaques em águas calmas; Caiaques dobráveis; Caiaques infláveis; Kits de caiaque; Playboats; Caiaques de corrida; Caiaques Sit-On-Top; Caiaques para slalom; Caiaques para surf; Caiaques para corredeiras
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Člnkovanie a rafting > Kajaky: Kajaky Creekboat; Rybárske kajaky; Kajaky na pokojnú vodu; Skladacie kajaky; Nafukovacie kajaky; Kajakové súpravy; Voľnočasové člny; Závodné kajaky; Kajaky so sedením hore; Slalomové kajaky; Surfovacie kajaky; Kajaky na divokú vodu
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Pływanie łodzią i rafting > Kajaki: Creekboats; Kajaki wędkarskie; Kajaki sprinterskie; Kajaki składane; Kajaki nadmuchiwane; Zestawy kajakowe; Łodzie do zabawy; Kajaki wyścigowe; Kajaki sit-on-top; Kajaki slalomowe; Kajaki surfingowe; Kajaki górskie
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Ναυσιπλοΐα & ράφτινγκ > Καγιάκ: Βαρκάκια για ρυάκια; Καγιάκ ψαρέματος; Καγιάκ για ήρεμα νερά; Πτυσσόμενα καγιάκ; Φουσκωτά καγιάκ; Κιτ καγιάκ; Σκάφη για παιχνίδι; Αγωνιστικά καγιάκ; Καγιάκ Sit-On-Top; Σλάλομ καγιάκ; Καγιάκ για σερφ; Καγιάκ για ορμητικά νερά
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > การล่องเรือและแพ > เรือคายัค: เรือความจุสูง; เรือคายัคตกปลา; เรือคายัคน้ำนิ่ง; เรือคายัคแบบพับ; เรือคายัคเป่าลม; ชุดอุปกรณ์เรือคายัค; เรือเพลย์โบ๊ท; เรือคายัคแข่ง; เรือคายัคแบบนั่งข้างบน; เรือคายัคสลาลม; เรือคายัคโต้คลื่น; เรือคายัคล่องแก่ง
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Båt og rafting > Kajakker: Elvebåter; Fiskekajakker; Flatvannskajakker; Sammenleggbare kajakker; Oppblåsbare kajakker; Kajakksett; Lekebåter; Racerkajakker; Sit-On-Top-kajakker; Slalåmkajakker; Surfekajakker; Elvekajakker
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Товары для гребли и рафтинга > Байдарки: Байдарки для сплавов; Рыболовные каяки; Байдарки для спокойной воды; Складные байдарки; Надувные байдарки; Наборы для сборки каяков; Байдарки для фристайла; Складные байдарки; Байдарки с посадкой сверху; Байдарки для гребного слалома; Байдарки для серфинга; Байдарки для бурной воды
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Plovba in rafting > Kajaki: Rečni kajaki; Kajaki za ribarjenje; Kajaki za mirne vode; Zložljivi kajaki; Napihljivi kajaki; Kompleti za kajak; Kajaki za izvajanje trikov; Tekmovalni kajaki; Kajaki s sedežem na vrhu; Slalomski kajaki; Kajaki za deskanje; Kajaki za divje vode
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Bootssport > Kajaks: Creek Boats; Angelkajaks; Flachwasserkajaks; Faltkajaks; Aufblasbare Kajaks; Kajak-Bausätze; Playboats; Rennkajaks; Sit-On-Top-Kajaks; Slalom-Kajaks; Surfkajaks; Wildwasserkajaks
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 赛艇用品 > 单人皮划艇: 溪流皮划艇; 钓鱼皮划艇; 静水单人皮划艇; 折叠单人皮划艇; 充气单人皮划艇; 皮划艇套件; 游乐船; 竞赛单人皮划艇; 平台式单人皮划艇; 激流回旋单人皮划艇; 冲浪单人皮划艇; 激流单人皮划艇
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Varen en rafting > Kajaks: Kreekboten; Viskajaks; Vlakwaterkajaks; Opvouwbare kajaks; Opblaasbare kajaks; Kajakkits; Speelboten; Racekayaks; Sit-on-topkajaks; Slalomkajaks; Surfkajaks; Wildwaterkajaks
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Plovljenje čamcem i rafting > Kajaci: Čamci za jezera; Kajaci za ribolov; Kajaci za ravne vode; Sklopivi kajaci; Kajaci na napuhavanje; Kompleti za kajak; Čamci za divlje vode; Trkaći kajaci; Sit-on-top kajaci; Slalom kajaci; Kajaci za surfanje; Kajaci za divlje vode
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Veneily ja koskenlasku > Kajakit: Jokiveneet; Kalastuskajakit; Merikajakit; Kokoontaitettavat kajakit; Puhallettavat kajakit; Kajakkipakkaukset; Leikkiveneet; Kilpakajakit; Päällä istuttavat kajakit; Slalom-kajakit; Surffikajakit; Koskenlaskukajakit